Washington statutes.
RCW 19.76.130

Refilling bottles, etc.—Penalty.

Any person who violates RCW 19.76.100 through 19.76.120 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined five dollars for each and every cask, barrel, keg, or box, and fifty cents for each and every bottle so by him, her, or them filled, bought, sold, used, trafficked in, or wantonly destroyed, together with costs of suit for first offense, and ten dollars for each and every cask, barrel, keg, and box and one dollar for each and every bottle so filled, bought, sold, used, trafficked in, or wantonly destroyed, together with the costs of suit for each subsequent offense.

[ 2003 c 53 s 149.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.